Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.232

Concurrent authority to investigate crimes and initiate and conduct prosecutions—Payment of costs.

(1) The attorney general shall have concurrent authority and power with the prosecuting attorneys to investigate crimes and initiate and conduct prosecutions upon the request of or with the concurrence of any of the following:

(a) The county prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which the offense has occurred;

(b) The governor of the state of Washington; or

(c) A majority of the committee charged with the oversight of the organized crime intelligence unit.

(2) Such request or concurrence shall be communicated in writing to the attorney general.

(3) Prior to any prosecution by the attorney general under this section, the attorney general and the county in which the offense occurred shall reach an agreement regarding the payment of all costs, including expert witness fees, and defense attorneys' fees associated with any such prosecution.

[ 1986 c 257 s 16; 1981 c 335 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 257: See note following RCW 9A.56.010.